Arkansas, session 2025, HB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-22-1011(b), concerning building egress
at schools under the Arkansas Comprehensive Fire Protection Act of 1993, is
reenacted to ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to
codify the subsection at § 20-22-1011(b).
(b) A person shall not be impeded from building egress in compliance
with the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code and the standards for accessible
design under the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2023.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-56-404(d)(2)-(4), concerning permits for
the sale, distribution, or manufacture of hemp-derived products, are amended
to read as follows to clarify references:
(2) When a partnership or limited liability company permitted
under this subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the managing partner,
managing member, president, or chief executive officer:
(A) The existing permit issued under this subchapter is
*JMB005*
01/31/2025 10:09:26 AM JMB005

HB1360
void; and
(B) The partnership or limited liability company:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the permit managing partner, managing member, president, or
chief executive officer.
(3) When a nonpublicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
nonpublicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The nonpublicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the permit president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(4) When a publicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
publicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The publicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
01/31/2025 10:09:26 AM JMB005

HB1360
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the permit president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.
















01/31/2025 10:09:26 AM JMB005